District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1151.06

Time limit for the operation of an exploratory committee.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-104, § 7, 54 DCR 12218
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(f), 59 DCR 1862

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(f) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).